Utah statutes.
59-14-215.   Transitional inventory tax on cigarettes -- Penalties and interest for failure to comply -- Credit or refund for outdated, unaffixed stamps.

(1)  In addition to the tax described in Section 59-14-204, there is imposed, beginning on July 1, 2010, an inventory tax on all cigarettes subject to the tax described in Section 59-14-204, upon the sale, use, storage, or distribution of those cigarettes in the state, as follows:

(a)  the tax imposed in this section applies only to cigarettes sold, used, stored, or distributed in the state on or after July 1, 2010:

(i)  that have a stamp that reflects that the tax paid on those cigarettes was paid at the tax rate imposed under Section 59-14-204 that was applicable on June 30, 2010; and

(ii)  for which the tax imposed in this section has not been paid; and

(b)  the tax imposed in this section is equal to the difference between:

(i)  the tax imposed on those cigarettes under Section 59-14-204, beginning on July 1, 2010; and

(ii)  the tax imposed on those cigarettes under Section 59-14-204 on or before June 30, 2010.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided under this chapter, the tax imposed under this section shall be paid by any person who is the manufacturer, jobber, importer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer.

(3)  A person described in Subsection (2) shall remit the tax imposed in this section, on a return prescribed by the commission, on or before July 31, 2010.

(4)  Failure of a person to comply with the requirements of this section subjects the person to the penalties and interest described in Sections 59-1-401 and 59-1-402.

(5)  The commission may not waive the interest or penalties imposed on a person for failure to comply with the requirements of this section.

(6) (a)  Beginning on July 1, 2010, it is unlawful to affix a stamp to cigarettes that reflects payment of the tax imposed under Section 59-14-204 at the rate that was applicable on or before June 30, 2010.

(b)  A person who violates Subsection (6)(a) may be required by the commission to pay as part of the tax, and in addition to any other penalty provided in this chapter, a penalty of $25 for each offense, to be assessed and collected by the commission in accordance with Chapter 1, Part 14, Assessment, Collections, and Refunds Act.

(c)  A person who, on or after July 1, 2010, possesses tax stamps described in Subsection (6)(a) may return the stamps to the commission for a credit or refund.



Amended by Chapter 407, 2010 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Enacted by Chapter 415, 2010 General Session

